Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Department of Health and State Health Commissioner.

§ 32.1-16.
State Department of Health.

There shall be a State Department of Health in the executive department responsible to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources. The Department shall be under the supervision and management of the State Health Commissioner. The Commissioner shall carry out his management and supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the policies, rules and regulations of the Board.

In addition to other duties imposed on the Department pursuant to this title, the Department shall assist in the plan management functions of the federal health benefit exchange established by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to § 1321 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act codified as 42 U.S.C. § 18041(c) in the Commonwealth, including providing assistance to the State Corporation Commission in its performance of plan management functions as set forth in §

38.2-326

. The Department shall be compensated for expenses incurred in providing such services.

History.

1979, c. 711; 2013, cc. 670, 679.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 670 and 679, cl. 2 provides: “That no agent, employee, officer, or agency of the Commonwealth, including but not limited to the State Corporation Commission and the Virginia Department of Health, is authorized to take any action to establish, or that could be deemed to establish, a health benefit exchange pursuant to § 1311 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act codified as 42 U.S.C. § 18031.”

Acts 2017, c. 172, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health (the Department) shall convene a work group composed of stakeholders, including representatives of law enforcement, emergency medical services providers, health insurance providers, the Medevac Committee of the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, emergency physicians, and other interested stakeholders, to review the rules, regulations, and protocols governing use of air transportation services, also known as air ambulances, in emergency medical situations. The Department shall also review the rules, regulations, and protocols governing dispatch of air transportation services providers in response to emergency medical situations and develop recommendations for changes to such rules, regulations, and protocols that will address differences in procedures governing dispatch of air transportation services providers in emergency medical situations, differences in billing that may affect individuals involved in emergency medical situations during which air transportation services providers are dispatched for the provision of air transportation, and other issues related to the use of air transportation services in emergency medical situations. The Department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 476, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall evaluate the need for 180-day biochemical oxygen demand sampling of small alternative onsite sewage systems that serve no more than three attached or detached single-family residences with a combined average flow of less than or equal to 1,000 gallons per day of residential strength sewage, or a structure with an average daily sewage flow of less than or equal to 1,000 gallons per day of residential strength sewage, and shall report its findings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 602, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Health shall take steps to begin eliminating site evaluation and design services for onsite sewage systems and private wells provided by the Department. In doing so, the Department shall:

“1. Require, in cases in which site evaluations and design services for onsite sewage systems and private wells are provided by private sector service providers, that such site evaluation and design service providers disclose to the property owner when a conventional onsite sewage system is an option;

“2. Revise agency regulations and policies to require Department staff to inspect all onsite sewage systems and private wells designed by private sector service providers;

“3. Expand efforts to educate the public concerning the design, operation, and maintenance of onsite sewage systems and private wells;

“4. Expand efforts to incorporate onsite sewage systems and private well data into community health assessments;

“5. Enhance quality assurance checks and inspection procedures for the review of evaluations, designs, and installations by private sector service providers and update its quality assurance manual to reflect this change in the agency’s business model;

“6. Consider separating work unit functions regarding permitting and enforcement for onsite sewage systems and private wells to ensure that staff reviewing evaluations and designs for permitting purposes are separate and independent from staff performing enforcement functions;

“7. Improve the collection and management of data about onsite sewage systems and private wells, including (i) creating a web-based reporting system for conventional onsite sewage system operation and maintenance, (ii) accepting applications and payments online, (iii) making onsite sewage system and private well records available online, (iv) creating a complete electronic record of all permitted onsite sewage systems and private wells in the Commonwealth, and (v) creating procedures for tracking Notices of Alleged Violations and corrective actions; and

“8. Revise agency policies to allow the transfer of valid construction permits for onsite sewage systems and private wells to new property owners.”

Acts 2017, c. 602, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health shall report on its progress in implementing the provisions of this act and any recommendations for statutory, regulatory, policy or budgetary changes that may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 1, 2017.”

Acts 2020, c. 677, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Education, in collaboration with the Department of Health and medical professional societies, shall develop and distribute for use by local school boards health and safety best practice guidelines for the effective integration of digital devices in public schools no later than the 2021-2022 school year. The guidelines shall be based on peer-reviewed, independently funded studies and shall at a minimum address digital device use for different age ranges and developmental levels, the amount of time spent on digital devices in the classroom, appropriate break frequency from the use of digital devices, physical positioning of digital devices in the classroom, the use of digital devices for homework, and recommended teacher training to ensure best practice implementation.”

Acts 2020, c. 932, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall convene a work group to review and make recommendations on increasing the availability of the clinical workforce for nursing homes in the Commonwealth. The work group shall include representatives from the Virginia Health Care Association, the Virginia Center for Assisted Living, Dignity for the Aged, the Virginia Nurses Association, LeadingAge Virginia, and other stakeholders as appropriate. The Department shall collaborate with the Department of Health Professions, the Governor’s Chief Workforce Development Advisor, and other state agencies as appropriate. The Department shall report all recommendations to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions on or before November 15, 2020.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 670 and 679 are nearly identical, and inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Employee of the Department of Health may operate consulting business specializing in radon testing,

as long as the employee does so during nonworking hours in a manner that does not conflict with his responsibilities to the Commonwealth, and the business does not conflict with any Department of Health policies governing outside employment. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Dave Nutter, Member, House of Delegates, 10-048, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 63 (9/10/10).

§ 32.1-17.
Appointment of Commissioner; qualifications; term.

There shall be a State Health Commissioner appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by each house of the General Assembly. The Commissioner shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in this Commonwealth and shall be certified by the American Board of Preventive Medicine or a recognized board in a primary care specialty as approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties, experienced in public health duties, sanitary science and environmental health, and otherwise qualified to execute the duties incumbent upon him by law.

The Commissioner shall be appointed for a term coincident with that of the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-23, 32-25; 1979, c. 711; 2000, c. 168.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 611, cl. 1 provides: “That the Commissioner of Health shall convene a work group to study the occurrence of perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS), perfluorobutyrate (PFBA), perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), perfluorohexane sulfonate (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), and other perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), as deemed necessary, in the Commonwealth’s public drinking water and may develop recommendations for specific maximum contaminant levels for PFOA, PFOS, PFBA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, and other PFAS, as deemed necessary, for inclusion in regulations of the Board of Health applicable to waterworks. Such work group shall include representatives of waterworks owners and operators, including owners and operators of community waterworks, private companies that operate waterworks, advocacy groups representing owners and operators of waterworks, consumers of public drinking water, a manufacturer with chemistry experience, and such other stakeholders as the Commissioner of Health shall deem appropriate. The Office of Drinking Water of the Department of Health shall provide administrative and technical support for the work group. In completing its work, the work group (i) shall (a) determine current levels of PFOA, PFOS, PFBA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, and other PFAS, as deemed necessary, contamination in the Commonwealth’s public drinking water, provided that in making such determination of current levels, the Department of Health shall sample no more than 50 representative waterworks and major sources of water; (b) identify possible sources of such contamination, where identified; and (c) evaluate existing approaches to regulating PFOA, PFOS, PFBA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, and other PFAS, as deemed necessary, in drinking water, including regulatory approaches adopted by other states and the federal government, and (ii) may develop recommendations for specific maximum contaminant levels for PFOA, PFOS, PFBA, PFHpA, PFHxS, PFNA, and other PFAS, as deemed necessary, to be included in regulations of the Board of Health applicable to waterworks. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and Education and Health by December 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 215, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1.That the State Health Commissioner shall establish the Task Force on Maternal Health Data and Quality Measures (the Task Force) for the purpose of evaluating maternal health data collection processes to guide policies in the Commonwealth to improve maternal care, quality, and outcomes for all birthing people in the Commonwealth. The Task Force shall consist of three members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and five members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates, the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services or his designee, the Director of the Office of Health Equity or his designee, the Director of the Virginia Neonatal Perinatal Collaborative or his designee, the Chief Executive Officer of Virginia Health Information or his designee, and such other persons as the State Health Commissioner deems appropriate, including: (i) two individuals who are licensed obstetricians or gynecologists practicing in the Commonwealth; (ii) two individuals who are licensed nurse practitioners or registered nurses who work in the area of maternal health in the Commonwealth; (iii) two experts in postpartum care and depression in the Commonwealth, ensuring regional representation; (iv) at least one individual who is an expert in maternal health data collection processes; (v) four representatives from organizations or groups in the Commonwealth that specialize in serving vulnerable populations and improving equity and outcomes in maternal health; (vi) individuals who are licensed in neonatal and premature infant care and nutrition; (vii) a representative in maternal health from each of the health care payers in the Commonwealth; (viii) health care experts who serve underserved and minority populations in the Commonwealth; (ix) two members of the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association; (x) the Program Manager for the Maternal Mortality Review Team; (xi) two individuals who are certified nurse midwives and one certified midwife and one certified professional midwife; and (xii) any other stakeholders as may be appropriate. The Task Force shall:

“1. Monitor progress and evaluate all data from state-level stakeholders, including third-party payers, and all available electronic claims data to examine quality of care with regard to race, ethnicity, and other demographic and clinical outcome data;

“2. Monitor progress and evaluate all data from existing state-level sources mandated for maternal care, including new Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) measure updates to Prenatal and Postpartum Care and Postpartum Depression;

“3. Examine the barriers preventing the collection and reporting of timely maternal health data from all stakeholders, including payers;

“4. Examine current maternal health benefit requirements and determine the need for additional benefits to protect the health of birthing people;

“5. Evaluate the impact of Social Determinants of Health (SDoH) screening on pregnant women and its impact on outcomes data;

“6. Collect and analyze data one year after delivery; and

“7. Develop recommendations for standard quality metrics on maternal care.

“All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Task Force upon request. The Task Force shall report its findings and conclusions to the Governor and General Assembly by December 1 of each year regarding its activities and shall conclude its work by December 1, 2023.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 168 inserted “or a recognized board in a primary care specialty as approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties” in the second sentence of subsection A.

§ 32.1-18.
Executive officer of Board.

The Commissioner shall be the executive officer of the Board but shall not be a member thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-24; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-19.
Duties prescribed by Board.

The Commissioner shall perform such duties as the Board may require, in addition to the duties required by law.

The Commissioner shall, along with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, work to combat childhood obesity and other chronic health conditions that affect school-age children.

The Commissioner shall ensure, in the licensure of health care facilities, that quality of care, patient safety, and patient privacy are the overriding goals of such licensure and related enforcement efforts.

The Commissioner shall coordinate the Department’s emergency preparedness and response efforts.

The Commissioner shall ensure that prevention of disease and protection of public health remain the Department’s overriding goals.

The Commissioner shall designate a senior staff member of the Department, who shall be a licensed physician, to oversee minority health efforts of the Department.

The Commissioner shall designate a senior official of the Department, who shall be a licensed physician or nurse practitioner, to coordinate all women’s health efforts in the Department including, but not limited to, the “Every Woman’s Life Program,” and other efforts to prevent, detect, and treat breast cancer, cervical cancer, and other diseases that primarily affect women.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-27; 1979, c. 711; 2007, cc. 43, 55, 320, 343, 793, 797.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall evaluate existing statutory and regulatory tools for ensuring that chemical storage in the Commonwealth is conducted in a manner that is protective of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, and the environment of the Commonwealth. This evaluation may include (i) an examination of Virginia’s existing programs to protect drinking water resources from contamination from chemical storage; (ii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in drinking water protections related to chemical storage; (iii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in chemical storage standards; (iv) any recommendations on chemical storage in the Commonwealth to address protection of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, the environment, and the economy of the Commonwealth; and (v) other policies and procedures that the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management determine may enhance the protection of Virginia’s drinking water resources and the safe storage of chemicals in Virginia.

“The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall report the findings of the evaluation to the State Water Commission, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources no later than December 1, 2016.

“For purposes of this section, ‘chemical storage’ means those chemicals identified by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act (SARA) and the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act (EPCRA) that provides for hazardous chemical storage reporting requirements in Section 312 of the SARA and are stored in excess of 10,000 gallons.”

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2017.”

Acts 2016, c. 73, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall convene a work group of stakeholders, which shall include representatives of the Department of Health, the Department of Emergency Management, the State Anatomical Program, procurement organizations, and local search and rescue teams and organizations, to (i) identify and evaluate options for using human remains donated to search and rescue teams and organizations as anatomical gifts for the purpose of training dogs to find human remains during search and rescue operations and (ii) establish policies and procedures to govern the process of using anatomical gifts for such purpose. In conducting its work, the work group shall respect the sensitive nature of donation for donors and families of decedents and assure that all policies and procedures reflect and incorporate this understanding. The work group shall report its activities, findings, and recommendations to the General Assembly by December 1, 2016.”

Acts 2020, cc. 236 and 368, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall determine the feasibility of establishing a Medical Excellence Zone Program (the Program) to allow citizens of the Commonwealth living in rural underserved areas to receive medical treatment via telemedicine services as defined in §

38.2-3418.16

of the Code of Virginia. The Department shall set out the criteria that would be required for a locality or group of localities in the Commonwealth to be eligible for the designation as a medical excellence zone. Such criteria shall include that any locality or group of localities eligible for the Program must demonstrate economic disadvantage of residents in the proposed medical excellence zone. The Department of Health shall report its findings to the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions by November 1, 2020.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 43 and 55 are identical, and inserted subsection A designation; and added subsection B.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 320 and 797 are identical, and added subsections B through D (now C through E).

The 2007 amendment by c. 343 added subsection B (now F).

The 2007 amendment by c. 793 added subsection B (now G).

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-19.1.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 683.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-19.1

, which required reporting of telemedicine initiatives, was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 1031.

§ 32.1-20.
Vested with authority of Board.

The Commissioner shall be vested with all the authority of the Board when it is not in session, subject to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-28; 1979, c. 711.

Cross references.

As to regulations for control of rabies, see §§

32.1-48.1

through

32.1-48.4

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Executive order requiring face masks. —

Winery was not entitled to a temporary injunction from enforcement of an executive order requiring face coverings to be worn by individuals in certain settings, because the Governor of Virginia and the Virginia State Health Commissioner validly enacted the order to limit the spread of COVID-19 and expressly waived the application of the criminal prohibition on the wearing of a mask to conceal one’s identity. The winery could not demonstrate a likely success as to the merits, irreparable harm, the balance of equities, and the public interest. Strother v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 233, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 106 (Fauquier County June 29, 2020).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Enforcement of quarantine in health emergency. —

The Governor, State Health Commissioner and Board of Health have the authority in a public health emergency to issue orders or regulations to enforce a quarantine. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John M. O’Bannon, III, Member, House of Delegates, 02-069,
(11/13/02).

§ 32.1-21.
Salary; teaching activities.

The Commissioner shall receive such salary as is fixed by law and shall devote his entire time to his official duties; provided, however, that the Board, with the approval of the Governor, may authorize the Commissioner to accept or undertake teaching activities.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-26; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-22.
Personnel; Deputy Commissioner.

The Commissioner may employ such personnel as are necessary for the proper performance of his duties as executive officer of the Board.

The Commissioner, subject to the approval of the Board, may appoint a Deputy Commissioner of Health who shall meet the qualifications for appointment as Commissioner and who may exercise the powers and perform the duties of the Commissioner in the case of the absence or inability to act of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-31; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-23.
Publication of information.

The Commissioner may provide for the publication and distribution of such information as may contribute to the preservation of the public health and the prevention of disease.

The Commissioner shall establish, maintain and publicize a toll-free number to provide resource and referral information on pharmaceutical companies’ free and discount drug programs for persons who demonstrate financial hardship or otherwise meet program eligibility criteria. Such information shall include, but not be limited to, available drugs, participating pharmaceutical companies, and application procedures for each of the pharmaceutical companies and dispensing methods. Such information shall also include the locations of various Pharmacy Connect programs accessible by that person. The Commissioner may contract with one or more public or private organizations to administer this resource and referral program.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-11; 1979, c. 711; 2001, c. 823; 2002, c. 896.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 823, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective until such time as funds are appropriated or available for this purpose.” Funds have been made available to the Virginia Department of Health to effectuate the provision adding subsection B of §

32.1-23

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 823 added subsection B.
For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 896, in subsection B, inserted “and discount” preceding “drug programs” and “or otherwise meet program eligibility criteria” in the first sentence; inserted “and” preceding “application procedures” in the second sentence; and added the third sentence.

§ 32.1-23.01.
Information about and resources on palliative care.

The Department shall make information about and resources on palliative care available to the public, health care providers, and health care facilities on its website. Such information shall include information about the delivery of palliative care in the home and in primary, secondary, and tertiary environments; best practices for the delivery of palliative care; consumer education materials and referral information for palliative care; and continuing education opportunities for health care providers.

History.

2017, cc. 471, 746.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 471 and 746 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 32.1-23.1.
Alternative delivery of certain information; Commissioners to develop single application form for pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards; certain analysis of access to The Pharmacy Connection program.

The Commissioner shall create links from the Virginia Department of Health’s website to the Virginia Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services’ website and its affiliated sites pertaining to pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards. The Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall cooperate with the Commissioner of Health by ensuring that such information is available on the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services’ website.

The Commissioner shall ensure that all clinical sites administered by local health departments are provided with adequate information concerning the services of the Virginia Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, including, but not limited to, its toll-free telephone number and its website information on pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards.

The Commissioner of Health and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall coordinate the dissemination of information to the public regarding any pharmaceutical discount purchasing card programs while maintaining a neutral posture regarding such programs.In addition, with such funds as may be made available, the Commissioner of Health and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall disseminate information to the public concerning recent congressional actions relating to pharmaceutical benefits to be provided under the Medicare program and how such benefits may help senior citizens with the costs of pharmaceutical benefits.

The Commissioner shall establish a toll-free telephone number, to be administered by the Virginia Department of Health, which shall provide recorded information concerning services available from the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Virginia Association of Area Agencies on Aging, and other appropriate organizations for senior citizens.

The Commissioner of Health and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall develop a strategy, in coordination with the Virginia Association of Area Agencies on Aging and other private and nonprofit organizations, for disseminating information to the public concerning the availability of pharmaceutical assistance programs and for training senior citizen volunteers to assist in completing applications for pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards.

In addition to the responsibilities set forth in subsections A through E, the Commissioner of Health and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall encourage pharmaceutical manufacturers to include application forms for pharmaceutical discount purchasing card programs on their respective websites in a format capable of being downloaded and printed by consumers. When practicable, the website maintained by the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall include direct links to such forms. Further, the Commissioner of Health and the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall report to the Governor and General Assembly by October 30, 2004, on the feasibility of developing a single application form for Virginians to use to seek eligibility for the nearly 50 pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards.In determining feasibility, the Commissioners shall obtain copies of the application forms used by such pharmaceutical assistance programs and pharmaceutical discount purchasing cards in Virginia, compile a list of the various information required to complete such application forms, identify common elements, and analyze the forms for readability and simplicity. Upon completion of this analysis, the Commissioners shall assess the feasibility of designing a single, concise application form that is logically formatted, written in clear and easily comprehensible language, and covers any and all data that may be required to obtain eligibility for any such pharmaceutical assistance program or pharmaceutical discount purchasing card.

In order to maximize the benefits of the new Medicare pharmaceutical discount card program for Virginia’s senior citizens, the Commissioner of Health shall annually for two years commencing on July 1, 2005, (i) analyze access to The Pharmacy Connection program vis-a-vis the Medicare pharmaceutical discount card program, the $600 transitional coverage provided under federal law, and pharmaceutical companies’ offers of “wrap-around” coverage for low-income seniors; and (ii) recommend, to the Virginia Health Care Foundation, the Secretary of Health and Human Resources, and the Governor, appropriate localities for expansion of access to The Pharmacy Connection program in Virginia, particularly in areas having high concentrations of low-income seniors. The goal of the Commissioner’s analysis shall be to facilitate statewide implementation of The Pharmacy Connection program. The Commissioner shall complete this analysis by October 31 of each year and shall immediately request an estimate of the costs of the recommended expansion of such access from the Virginia Health Care Foundation to be forwarded to the Secretary and the Governor, for inclusion in the appropriation act, in so far as possible and appropriate to promote the health and safety of Virginia’s senior citizens.

To assist them in completing the responsibilities set forth in subsections E, F, and G, the Commissioners may appoint an advisory task force of stakeholders.

History.

2003, cc. 661, 674; 2004, cc. 73, 318; 2005, c. 715; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 73 added the second paragraph in subsection C; and added subsection E.

The 2004 amendment by c. 318 added the second paragraph in subsection C; and added subsections E through G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 715 inserted present subsection G; redesignated former subsection G as subsection H; inserted “and G” in subsection H; and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in subsections A through F, substituted references to the “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” or similar language; and in subsection E, inserted “Association of.”

§ 32.1-23.2.
Sexual assault nurse examiner information.

The Department shall develop and make available on a website maintained by the Department information about the availability of certified sexual assault nurse examiners in the Commonwealth. Such information shall include the name of the hospital at which a certified sexual assault nurse examiner is employed; the location, including street address, of the hospital; and the contact information for the hospital. A link to the information shall be prominently displayed on the Department’s website, and such information shall be made available in a format that is easily accessible to and navigable by members of the public.

Every hospital licensed by the Department shall quarterly report to the Department, in a form and by such date as shall be designated by the Department, the total number of certified sexual assault nurse practitioners employed by the hospital and the location, including street address, and contact information for each location at which such certified sexual assault nurse practitioner provides services.

History.

2020, c. 1088.

§ 32.1-23.3.
Eligible Health Care Provider Reserve Directory.

As used in this section, “eligible health care provider” means (i) any person licensed, registered, or certified by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions whose license, registration, or certification is in good standing, or was in good standing within five years or less prior and only lapsed because such person retired; (ii) any emergency medical services provider certified or licensed by the Department of Health whose certification or licensing is in good standing, or was in good standing within five years or less prior and only lapsed because such person retired; and (iii) any fourth-year medical student who is engaged in a course of study approved by the Board of Medicine and is in good standing with the student’s medical school and is scheduled to graduate early or on time who registers for the Eligible Health Care Provider Reserve Directory (the Directory).

The Department shall establish an Eligible Health Care Provider Reserve Directory to collect information regarding eligible health care providers in the Commonwealth who are qualified and who may be available to assist in the response to a public health emergency. The Directory shall include the name, contact information, and licensure, certification, or registration type and status of the eligible health care provider or, if the eligible health care provider is a fourth-year medical student, academic standing and anticipated graduation date of the fourth-year medical student. Every health regulatory board of the Department of Health Professions, the Office of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health, and each medical school located in the Commonwealth, upon the request of a fourth-year medical student, shall provide such information to the Department for inclusion in the Directory.

During a declared public health emergency, the Governor may request and the Commissioner may provide information regarding eligible health care providers from the Directory. Information obtained from the Directory may be used to (i) identify eligible health care providers who may be able to assist in responding to the public health emergency and (ii) contact such eligible health care providers to request assistance in responding to the public health emergency. Information contained in the Directory shall not be used for any other purpose.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 530.

Effective date.

This section is effective April 7, 2021, by emergency.